District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.76

Rulemaking; enforcement; and adjudication.

(a)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter, including the manner and amount of a fare, fee, or fine.

(b)

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as sanctions for an infraction of a rule promulgated under subsection (a) of this section pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2 [§ 2-1801.01 et seq.].

History

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 11r
as added Apr. 20, 2013, D.C. Law 19-268, § 3, 60 DCR 1709

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-268 added this section.

Editor's Notes

Section 5 of D.C. Law 19-268 provided that this subchapter shall expire as of September 30, 2015.

Section 5 of D.C. Law 19-268, as amended by D.C. Law 21-36, §§ 6162 and 6163, provided that this subchapter shall expire as of September 30, 2016.